Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1923
Additional statement of defendant or name of eyewitness; prosecutor; notification required; failure to comply; effect.

If, subsequent to compliance with an order issued pursuant to section 29-1922, and prior to or during trial, the prosecuting authority discovers any additional statement made by the defendant or the name of any eyewitness who has identified the defendant at a lineup or showup previously requested or ordered which is subject to discovery or inspection under section 29-1922, he or she shall promptly notify the defendant or his or her attorney or the court of the existence of this additional material. Such notice shall be given at the time of the discovery of such additional material. If at any time during the course of the proceedings it is brought to the attention of the court that the prosecuting authority has failed to comply with this section or with an order issued pursuant to section 29-1922, the court may order the prosecuting authority to permit the discovery or inspection of materials or witnesses not previously disclosed, grant a continuance, or prohibit the prosecuting authority from introducing in evidence the material or the testimony of the witness or witnesses not disclosed, or it may enter such other order as it deems just under the circumstances.

Laws 1969, c. 230, § 2, p. 857;

Laws 1983, LB 110, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB496, § 10.